District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.101

Definitions.

(a)

The term “initiative” means the process by which the electors of the District of Columbia may propose laws (except laws appropriating funds) and present such proposed laws directly to the registered qualified electors of the District of Columbia for their approval or disapproval.

(b)

The term “referendum” means the process by which the registered qualified electors of the District of Columbia may suspend acts of the Council of the District of Columbia (except emergency acts, acts levying taxes, or acts appropriating funds for the general operation budget) until such acts have been presented to the registered qualified electors of the District of Columbia for their approval or rejection.

History

Mar. 10, 1978, D.C. Law 2-46, § 2, 24 DCR 199

Cross References

Elections, “proposer” defined, see § 1-1001.02.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1001.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-281.
1973 Ed., § 1-181.